Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1094
District maintaining more than one school; closing, when authorized.

The school board of any district maintaining more than one school may close any school or schools within such district and may make provision for the education of children either in another school of the district, in the school of any other district, or by correspondence instruction for such children as may be physically incapacitated for traveling to or attending other schools, with the permission of the parent.

Laws 1939, c. 113, § 1, p. 488;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 79-218;

R.S.1943, § 79-223;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 108, p. 727;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-469;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 740;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 113.

This section does not apply to school district having first class city within its boundaries. State ex rel. Strange v. School District of Nebraska City, 150 Neb. 109, 33 N.W.2d 358 (1948).

The school board of any district maintaining more than one school may close any school or schools within the district. Haskell v. Madison Cty. Sch. Dist. No. 0001, 17 Neb. App. 669, 771 N.W.2d 156 (2009).